Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5679XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 2038 Section 1. Section 328.35, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A remotely piloted aircraft, as defined 3 in section 715E.1, used directly and primarily for agricultural 4 purposes. 5 Sec. 2. Section 423.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. The sales price of a remotely piloted 8 aircraft, as defined in section 715E.1, used directly and 9 primarily for agricultural purposes. 10